en: Marinated turkey meats
fr: Viandes de dinde marinées

en: Turkey patties
de: Putenfrikadellen
fr: Galettes à la dinde
hr: Pureće pljeskavice
nl: Kalkoenpasteitjes

en: Turkey nuggets
bg: Пуешки хапки
fi: Kalkkunanugetit
fr: Nuggets de dinde
hr: Pureći nuggets
nl: Kalkoennuggets

en: Reconstituted turkey nuggets
fr: Nuggets de dinde reconstituée

en: Quail
fr: Caille
hr: Prepelica
ja: ウズラ類

en: Cooked quail with meat and skin
fr: Caille cuite avec viande et peau

en: quail meat and skin
fr: Viande et peau de caille

en: Quail meat
fr: Viande de caille
hr: Meso prepelice
ja: ウズラの肉

en: Frozen quail meat
fr: Viande de caille surgelée

en: Pheasant
bg: Фазан
fr: Faisans
hr: Fazan
ja: キジ

en: Pheasant meat
fr: Viande de faisan
hr: Meso fazana
ja: キジの肉

en: Pheasant meat and skin
fr: Viande et peau de faisan

en: Roasted pheasant meat, Baked pheasant meat
fr: Viande de faisan rôtie, Viande de faisan cuite au four

en: Fozen pheasant meat
fr: Viande de faisan surgelée

en: Ducks, Duck meat, Duck, duck meat
bg: Патешко
de: Enten, frisches Entenfleisch, Ente
es: Pato
fi: ankat
fr: Canards, viande de canard, Viande de canard crue
hr: Patke
it: Anatre
ja: 鴨肉
nl: Eendevlezen
pt: Patos
ru: Утка
tr: Ördek
zh: 鸭肉, 新鸭肉, 鸭

en: Frozen ducks
fr: Canards surgelés

en: Peking duck
de: Pekingente
fr: Canard laqué, Canard laqué de Pékin
hr: Pekinška patka
ja: 北京ダック
nl: Peking eend
zh: 北京烤鸭

en: Duck confit, Preserved duck
fr: Confits de canard, confit de canard
hr: Confit od patke
it: Confit di anatra
nl: Gekonfijte eend
zh: 油封鸭

en: Reheated duck confit conserved in rendered fat without skin
fr: Confit de canard sans peau réchauffé

en: Duck breasts, duck breasts
bg: Патешки гърди
de: Entenbrust
es: Pechugas de pato
fi: ankan rinnat
fr: Magrets de canard
hr: Pačja prsa
it: Petto d'anatra
ja: 鴨むね肉
nl: Eendenfilets, Eendenborst
tr: Ördek göğsü
zh: 鸭胸